Utah statutes.
75-2-507.   Revocation by writing or by act.
(1)  A will or any part thereof is revoked:
(a)  by executing a subsequent will that revokes the previous will or part
expressly or by inconsistency;  or
(b)  by performing a revocatory act on the will, if the testator performed the
act with the intent and for the purpose of revoking the will or part or if
another individual performed the act in the testator's conscious presence and
by the testator's direction.  For purposes of this subsection, "revocatory act
on the will" includes burning, tearing, canceling, obliterating, or destroying
the will or any part of it.  A burning, tearing, or canceling is a "revocatory
act on the will," whether or not the burn, tear, or cancellation touched any
of the words on the will.
(2)  If a subsequent will does not expressly revoke a previous will, the
execution of the subsequent will wholly revokes the previous will by
inconsistency if the testator intended the subsequent will to replace rather
than supplement the previous will.
(3)  The testator is presumed to have intended a subsequent will to replace
rather than supplement a previous will if the subsequent will makes a complete
disposition of the testator's estate.  If this presumption arises and is not
rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, the previous will is revoked;  only
the subsequent will is operative on the testator's death.
(4)  The testator is presumed to have intended a subsequent will to supplement
rather than replace a previous will if the subsequent will does not make a
complete disposition of the testator's estate.  If this presumption arises and
is not rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, the subsequent will revokes
the previous will only to the extent the subsequent will is inconsistent with
the previous will;  each will is fully operative on the testator's death to
the extent they are not inconsistent.
